test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - æra # and all the others, sigh.
    æra+V+Inf: æra
    æra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ærir
    æra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ærar
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ærdi
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: æraði
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ærdu
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: æraðu
    æra+V+Sup: ært
    æra+V+Sup: ærað
    æra+V+PrfPrc: ærdur
    æra+V+PrfPrc: æraður
    skemma+V+Inf: skemma
    æruskemma+V+Inf: æruskemma
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: æruskemmir
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: æruskemdi
    æruskemma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: æruskemdu
    æruskemma+V+Sup: æruskemt
    æruskemma+V+PrfPrc: æruskemdur
    greina+V+Inf: greina
    ættgreina+V+Inf: ættgreina
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ættgreinir
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ættgreinar
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ættgreindi
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ættgreinaði
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ættgreindu
    ættgreina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ættgreinaðu
    ættgreina+V+Sup: ættgreint
    ættgreina+V+Sup: ættgreinað
    ættgreina+V+PrfPrc: ættgreindur
    ættgreina+V+PrfPrc: ættgreinaður
    kæra+V+Inf: kæra
    ákæra+V+Inf: ákæra
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ákærir
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ákærdi
    ákæra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ákærdu
    ákæra+V+Sup: ákært
    ákæra+V+PrfPrc: ákærdur
    ana+V+Inf: ana
    ana+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: anir
    ana+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andi
    ana+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andu
    ana+V+Sup: ant
    ana+V+PrfPrc: andur
    øva+V+Inf: øva
    andøva+V+Inf: andøva
    andøva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andøvir
    andøva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andøvdi
    andøva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andøvdu
    andøva+V+Sup: andøvt
    andøva+V+PrfPrc: andøvdur
    stevna+V+Inf: stevna
    andstevna+V+Inf: andstevna
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andstevnir
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andstevndi
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andstevndu
    andstevna+V+Sup: andstevnt
    andstevna+V+PrfPrc: andstevndur
    døma+V+Inf: døma
    avdøma+V+Inf: avdøma
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avdømir
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avdømdi
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avdømdu
    avdøma+V+Sup: avdømt
    avdøma+V+PrfPrc: avdømdur
    egna+V+Inf: egna
    avegna+V+Inf: avegna
    avegna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avegnir
    avegna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avegndi
    avegna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avegndu
    avegna+V+Sup: avegnt
    avegna+V+PrfPrc: avegndur
    ferma+V+Inf: ferma
    avferma+V+Inf: avferma
    avferma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avfermir
    avferma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avfermdi
    avferma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avfermdu
    avferma+V+Sup: avfermt
    avferma+V+PrfPrc: avfermdur
    hoyra+V+Inf: hoyra
    avhoyra+V+Inf: avhoyra
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avhoyrir
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avhoyrdi
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avhoyrdu
    avhoyra+V+Sup: avhoyrt
    avhoyra+V+PrfPrc: avhoyrdur
    baga+V+Inf: baga
    baga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bagir
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bagdi
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bagdu
    baga+V+Sup: bagt
    baga+V+PrfPrc: bagdur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    bannføra+V+Inf: bannføra
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bannførir
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bannførdi
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bannførdu
    bannføra+V+Sup: bannført
    bannføra+V+PrfPrc: bannførdur
    beina+V+Inf: beina
    beina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: beinir
    beina+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: beindi
    beina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: beindu
    beina+V+Sup: beint
    beina+V+PrfPrc: beindur
    telva+V+Inf: telva
    bertelva+V+Inf: bertelva
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bertelvir
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bertelvar
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bertelvdi
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bertelvaði
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bertelvdu
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bertelvaðu
    bertelva+V+Sup: bertelvt
    bertelva+V+Sup: bertelvað
    bertelva+V+PrfPrc: bertelvdur
    bertelva+V+PrfPrc: bertelvaður
    bína+V+Inf: bína
    bína+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bínir
    bína+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bíndi
    bína+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bíndu
    bína+V+Sup: bínt
    bína+V+PrfPrc: bíndur
    ræna+V+Inf: ræna
    blóðræna+V+Inf: blóðræna
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: blóðrænir
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: blóðrændi
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: blóðrændu
    blóðræna+V+Sup: blóðrænt
    blóðræna+V+PrfPrc: blóðrændur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    bókføra+V+Inf: bókføra
    bókføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bókførir
    bókføra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bókførdi
    bókføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bókførdu
    bókføra+V+Sup: bókført
    bókføra+V+PrfPrc: bókførdur
    bøla+V+Inf: bøla
    bøla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bølir
    bøla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bøldi
    bøla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bøldu
    bøla+V+Sup: bølt
    bøla+V+PrfPrc: bøldur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    bólføra+V+Inf: bólføra
    bólføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bólførir
    bólføra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bólførdi
    bólføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bólførdu
    bólføra+V+Sup: bólført
    bólføra+V+PrfPrc: bólførdur
    hoyra+V+Inf: hoyra
    bønhoyra+V+Inf: bønhoyra
    bønhoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bønhoyrir
    bønhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bønhoyrdi
    bønhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bønhoyrdu
    bønhoyra+V+Sup: bønhoyrt
    bønhoyra+V+PrfPrc: bønhoyrdur
    køla+V+Inf: køla
    bráðkøla+V+Inf: bráðkøla
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðkølir
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bráðkøldi
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bráðkøldu
    bráðkøla+V+Sup: bráðkølt
    bráðkøla+V+PrfPrc: bráðkøldur
    brýna+V+Inf: brýna
    brýna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brýnir
    brýna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: brýndi
    brýna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: brýndu
    brýna+V+Sup: brýnt
    brýna+V+PrfPrc: brýndur
    dæla+V+Inf: dæla
    dæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dælir
    dæla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: dældi
    dæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: dældu
    dæla+V+Sup: dælt
    dæla+V+PrfPrc: dældur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    dagføra+V+Inf: dagføra
    dagføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dagførir
    dagføra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: dagførdi
    dagføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: dagførdu
    dagføra+V+Sup: dagført
    dagføra+V+PrfPrc: dagførdur
    deila+V+Inf: deila
    deila+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: deilir
    deila+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: deildi
    deila+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: deildu
    deila+V+Sup: deilt
    deila+V+PrfPrc: deildur
    deila+V+Inf: deila
    deila+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: deilir
    deila+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: deildi
    deila+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: deildu
    deila+V+Sup: deilt
    deila+V+PrfPrc: deildur
    demba+V+Inf: demba
    demba+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dembir
    demba+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: dembdi
    demba+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: dembdu
    demba+V+Sup: dembt
    demba+V+PrfPrc: dembdur
    døma+V+Inf: døma
    døma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dømir
    døma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: dømdi
    døma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: dømdu
    døma+V+Sup: dømt
    døma+V+PrfPrc: dømdur
    doyva+V+Inf: doyva
    doyva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: doyvir
    doyva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: doyvdi
    doyva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: doyvdu
    doyva+V+Sup: doyvt
    doyva+V+PrfPrc: doyvdur
    droyma+V+Inf: droyma
    droyma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: droymir
    droyma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: droymdi
    droyma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: droymdu
    droyma+V+Sup: droymt
    droyma+V+PrfPrc: droymdur
    dýva+V+Inf: dýva
    dýva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dývir
    dýva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: dývdi
    dýva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: dývdu
    dýva+V+Sup: dývt
    dýva+V+PrfPrc: dývdur
    tína+V+Inf: tína
    eftirtína+V+Inf: eftirtína
    egna+V+Inf: egna
    egna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: egnir
    egna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: egndi
    egna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: egndu
    egna+V+Sup: egnt
    egna+V+PrfPrc: egndur
    eira+V+Inf: eira
    eira+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eirir
    eira+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eirdi
    eira+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eirdu
    eira+V+Sup: eirt
    eira+V+PrfPrc: eirdur
    eira+V+Inf: eira
    eira+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eirir
    eira+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eirdi
    eira+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eirdu
    eira+V+Sup: eirt
    eira+V+PrfPrc: eirdur
    elva+V+Inf: elva
    elva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: elvir
    elva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: elvdi
    elva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: elvdu
    elva+V+Sup: elvt
    elva+V+PrfPrc: elvdur
    ferma+V+Inf: ferma
    endurferma+V+Inf: endurferma
    endurferma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: endurfermir
    endurferma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: endurfermdi
    endurferma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: endurfermdu
    endurferma+V+Sup: endurfermt
    endurferma+V+PrfPrc: endurfermdur
    evna+V+Inf: evna
    evna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: evnir
    evna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: evndi
    evna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: evndu
    evna+V+Sup: evnt
    evna+V+PrfPrc: evndur
    ræna+V+Inf: ræna
    eyðræna+V+Inf: eyðræna
    eyðræna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eyðrænir
    eyðræna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eyðrændi
    eyðræna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eyðrændu
    eyðræna+V+Sup: eyðrænt
    eyðræna+V+PrfPrc: eyðrændur
    sýna+V+Inf: sýna
    eyðsýna+V+Inf: eyðsýna
    eyðsýna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eyðsýnir
    eyðsýna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eyðsýndi
    eyðsýna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eyðsýndu
    eyðsýna+V+Sup: eyðsýnt
    eyðsýna+V+PrfPrc: eyðsýndur
    eygna+V+Inf: eygna
    eygna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eygnir
    eygna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eygndi
    eygna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eygndu
    eygna+V+Sup: eygnt
    eygna+V+PrfPrc: eygndur
    nevna+V+Inf: nevna
    eyknevna+V+Inf: eyknevna
    eyknevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eyknevnir
    eyknevna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eyknevndi
    eyknevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eyknevndu
    eyknevna+V+Sup: eyknevnt
    eyknevna+V+PrfPrc: eyknevndur
    fergja+V+Inf: fergja
    fergja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fergjir
    fergja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fergjar
    fergja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fergjdi
    fergja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fergjaði
    fergja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fergjdu
    fergja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fergjaðu
    fergja+V+Sup: fergjt
    fergja+V+Sup: fergjað
    fergja+V+PrfPrc: fergjdur
    fergja+V+PrfPrc: fergjaður
    ferma+V+Inf: ferma
    ferma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fermir
    ferma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fermdi
    ferma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fermdu
    ferma+V+Sup: fermt
    ferma+V+PrfPrc: fermdur
    ferma+V+Inf: ferma
    ferma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fermir
    ferma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fermdi
    ferma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fermdu
    ferma+V+Sup: fermt
    ferma+V+PrfPrc: fermdur
    fevna+V+Inf: fevna
    fevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fevnir
    fevna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fevndi
    fevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fevndu
    fevna+V+Sup: fevnt
    fevna+V+PrfPrc: fevndur
    fíra+V+Inf: fíra
    fjala+V+Inf: fjala
    fjala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fjalir
    fjala+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fjaldi
    fjala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fjaldu
    fjala+V+Sup: fjalt
    fjala+V+PrfPrc: fjaldur
    stýra+V+Inf: stýra
    fjarstýra+V+Inf: fjarstýra
    fjarstýra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fjarstýrir
    fjarstýra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fjarstýrdi
    fjarstýra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fjarstýrdu
    fjarstýra+V+Sup: fjarstýrt
    fjarstýra+V+PrfPrc: fjarstýrdur
    flana+V+Inf: flana
    flana+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: flanir
    flana+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: flandi
    flana+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flandu
    flana+V+Sup: flant
    flana+V+PrfPrc: flandur
    floyma+V+Inf: floyma
    floyma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: floymir
    floyma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: floymdi
    floyma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: floymdu
    floyma+V+Sup: floymt
    floyma+V+PrfPrc: floymdur
    føla+V+Inf: føla
    føla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: følir
    føla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: føldi
    føla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: føldu
    føla+V+Sup: følt
    føla+V+PrfPrc: føldur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    føra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: førir
    føra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: førdi
    føra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: førdu
    føra+V+Sup: ført
    føra+V+PrfPrc: førdur
    døma+V+Inf: døma
    fordøma+V+Inf: fordøma
    fordøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: fordømir
    fordøma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: fordømdi
    fordøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: fordømdu
    fordøma+V+Sup: fordømt
    fordøma+V+PrfPrc: fordømdur
    holva+V+Inf: holva
    forholva+V+Inf: forholva
    forholva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: forholvir
    forholva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: forholvar
    forholva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: forholvdi
    forholva+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: forholvaði
    forholva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: forholvdu
    forholva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: forholvaðu
    forholva+V+Sup: forholvt
    forholva+V+Sup: forholvað
    forholva+V+PrfPrc: forholvdur
    forholva+V+PrfPrc: forholvaður
    hoyra+V+Inf: hoyra
    forhoyra+V+Inf: forhoyra
    forhoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: forhoyrir
    forhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: forhoyrdi
    forhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: forhoyrdu
    forhoyra+V+Sup: forhoyrt
    forhoyra+V+PrfPrc: forhoyrdur
    søma+V+Inf: søma
    forsøma+V+Inf: forsøma
    forsøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: forsømir
    forsøma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: forsømdi
    forsøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: forsømdu
    forsøma+V+Sup: forsømt
    forsøma+V+PrfPrc: forsømdur
    føra+V+Inf: føra
    framføra+V+Inf: framføra
    framføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: framførir
    framføra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: framførdi
    framføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: framførdu
    framføra+V+Sup: framført
    framføra+V+PrfPrc: framførdur
    døma+V+Inf: døma
    frídøma+V+Inf: frídøma
    frídøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: frídømir
    frídøma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: frídømdi
    frídøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: frídømdu
    frídøma+V+Sup: frídømt
    frídøma+V+PrfPrc: frídømdur
